Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.200

L.I.D.'s—Authorization—Assessments, warrants, bonds—County treasurer's duties.

(1) Whenever the board of park and recreation commissioners of any district shall determine that any proposed capital improvement would be of special benefit to all or to any portion of the district, it may establish local improvement districts within its territory; levy special assessments under the mode of annual installments extending over a period not exceeding twenty years, on all property specially benefited by a local improvement, on the basis of special benefits to pay in whole or in part the damage or costs of any improvements ordered in the district; and issue local improvement bonds in the improvement district to be repaid by the collection of local improvement assessments. The method of establishment, levying, collection and enforcement of such assessments and issuance and redemption of local improvement warrants and bonds and the provisions regarding the conclusiveness of the assessment roll and the review by the superior court of any objections thereto shall be as provided for the levying, collection, and enforcement of local improvement assessments and the issuance of local improvement bonds by cities and towns, insofar as consistent herewith. The duties devolving upon the city treasurer are hereby imposed upon the county treasurer for the purposes hereof. The mode of assessment shall be determined by the board. Such bonds may be in any form, including coupon bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 85; 1983 c 3 s 80; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.200. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 21.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Local improvements, supplemental authority: Chapter 35.51 RCW.